Virginia statutes. Title 20. Domestic Relations.
Chapter 5.1.
Civil Proceedings to Compel Support.

§§ 20-88.1 through 20-88.11.

Repealed by Acts 1952, c. 516.

The numbers of

§§

20-88.1 through 20-88.11

were assigned by the Virginia Code Commission, the 1950 act having assigned no numbers.

Cross references.

- For new sections relating in part to similar subject matter, see
§§
20-88.32 through 20-88.82.